Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0062.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) Within 15 months after the effective date of this act, Not later than January 24, 2025, and subject to section 7(4), each school shall develop a drinking water management plan, and make the plan available to the department, school staff, parents and guardians of children enrolled in the school, and the general public on request. The plan must do all of the following: (a) Specify the location of each water outlet using 1 of the following categories: (i) The location where a water outlet will be maintained to deliver water for human consumption, whether as drinking water or as a component of a food or beverage, using 1 of the following categories: (A) The location where a filtered bottle-filling station will be maintained. The plan must provide for the maintenance of at least 1 filtered bottle-filling station for every 100 occupants of the school, not including visitors or individuals attending special events. (B) The location where a filtered faucet will be maintained. Filtered faucets may be maintained only when the installation of a filtered bottle-filling station is not feasible but a water outlet for human consumption is necessary, including, but not limited to, kitchens, nurses' stations, preschool classrooms, and teachers' lounges. (ii) The location where a water outlet will be maintained for purposes other than as described in subparagraph (i). (iii) The location where a water outlet will be shut off or rendered permanently inoperable. (b) Establish a schedule for when each of the following will occur: (i) Annual water sampling and testing of the filtered water at from each filtered bottle-filling station and filtered faucet in the school to ensure that the filters are properly installed and provide water with a lead concentration of not more than 5 parts per billion. (ii) Regular replacement of the filter cartridge for each filtered bottle-filling station and filtered faucet in compliance with the manufacturer instructions or recommendations of the department. (2) Each school shall review and update the plan at least once every 5 years and make changes as directed by the department or as needed to comply with this section. (3) A Subject to section 7(4), a school shall comply with the schedules under subsection (1)(b). (4) If the water sampling and testing under subsection (1)(b)(i) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, the school shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately check the status of the filter or filters at the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and replace the filter cartridge if the status light indicates that replacement is or will soon be required. (b) Ensure the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet is properly installed. (c) Resample and retest the filtered water. (d) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, do both of the following: (i) Send a copy of the test results and a document that lists the make and model of the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and filter cartridge to the department. (ii) Consult with the department and filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet manufacturer. (5) If water sampling and testing under subsection (1)(b)(i) or (4)(c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, the school shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately shut off or otherwise render inoperable the water outlet. (b) Post a conspicuous sign near the water outlet stating that the water outlet is inoperable because of high lead concentration and maintain the sign until the water outlet is returned to service under subdivision (e). (c) Replace the filter cartridge in the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet. (d) Resample and retest the water. (e) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, return the water outlet to service and comply with the requirement requirements under subsection (4)(b), (c), and (d). (f) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, do both of the following: (i) Within Not later than 30 days after receiving the test results, send a copy of the test results to the department and send a notice to school staff and each parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school, in a manner determined by the school district. The notice must state the amount of lead found in the water and information provided by the department on the health effects of lead exposure and ways to reduce childhood lead exposure. (ii) Develop a remediation plan in consultation with the department and incorporate the remediation plan into the plan under subsection (1). (6) The Subject to section 7(4), the school shall collect the water for the water sampling and testing conducted under this section. The water must be drawn from all of the bubbler fixtures of the filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets and must be collected in 250-milliliter bottles after at least an 8-hour stagnation period and before any water use occurs at the school. Water testing described under this section must be conducted at a laboratory certified for lead and copper testing for the approved EPA method. As used in this subsection, "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. Sec. 7. (1) By Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), by the end of the 2025-2026 school year, each a school shall do all of the following: (a) Install all filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets as indicated in the plan and not already in existence. (b) Shut off or render permanently inoperable any water outlet providing water for human consumption that is not a filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet. (c) Post a conspicuous sign near each water outlet indicating whether or not the outlet is intended to provide water for human consumption. (2) At the end of the 2025-2026 school year and annually thereafter, as applicable, each school shall submit to the department documentation, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department, that certifies that the school has complied with the requirements of this act. (3) Beginning 15 months after the effective date of this act, Not later than January 24, 2025, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), a school shall not install a drinking fountain, unless the drinking fountain is a filtered bottle-filling station. (4) If a school has conducted sampling and testing to test for the presence of lead between January 24, 2022 and January 24, 2025, and that sampling and testing does not indicate the presence of lead, the school is not required to develop a plan or install any filtered bottle-filling stations, filtered faucets, filtered pitchers, or other filtered sources by the timeline specified in subsection (1), and may proceed with the sampling and testing requirements specified under this subsection. If a school has not conducted sampling and testing to test for the presence of lead between January 24, 2022 and January 24, 2025, but before developing a plan, a school may conduct water sampling and testing to test for the presence of lead. The school shall collect the water for water sampling and testing. The water must be drawn from all of the water outlets and must be collected in 250-milliliter bottles after at least an 8-hour stagnation period and before any water use occurs at the school. After the school collects the water, the school shall deliver, through the mail or in person, all of the 250-milliliter bottles for water testing. Water testing described under this subsection must be conducted at a laboratory certified for lead and copper testing for the approved EPA method. If the water sampling and testing under this subsection does not indicate the presence of lead, the school is exempt from installing and providing water for human consumption from filtered bottle-filling stations, filtered faucets, or other filtered sources as described under this act. Water sampling and testing conducted under this subsection must be conducted at least once every 3 years. If the water sampling and testing under this subsection indicates the presence of lead, not later than 15 months after the presence of lead is indicated, the school must comply with the requirements under this act. As used in this subsection, "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (5) (4) The legislature shall annually appropriate to the department an amount sufficient to administer and comply with this act. Schools are not required to comply with this act unless the legislature has appropriated sufficient funds under this subsection.